Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses

§ 1391.
Qualifications for medical licensure.

Basic requirements.

An applicant for physician licensure as a medical doctor shall meet each of the requirements set forth in subdivisions (2)(A) through (D) of this subsection. A requirement may be met either by satisfying the requirement on its own terms or by qualifying for an exception established in this chapter or by the Board by rule.

An applicant shall submit evidence of identity acceptable to the Board as set forth by rule and shall establish that the applicant:

is at least 18 years of age;

has completed high school, or the equivalent, and at least two years of undergraduate postsecondary school;

has graduated from a medical school accredited by an organization that is acceptable to the Board, or from a medical school that has been approved by the Board by rule, with a degree of doctor of medicine or an equivalent as may be determined by the Board; and

is of sound moral character and professional competence as evidenced by:

references submitted in accordance with rules adopted by the Board;

a personal interview, as may be required in the discretion of the Board; and

the applicant’s entire personal history, as established by information about the applicant’s academic, licensing examination, employment, professional credentialing, professional certification, professional regulation, civil litigation, and criminal records submitted by the applicant or otherwise obtained by the Board in the application process.

Postgraduate training requirements.

A graduate of a U.S. or Canadian medical school accredited by a body that is acceptable to the Board shall submit evidence of the successful completion of at least two years of postgraduate training in a U.S. or Canadian program accredited by an organization that is acceptable to the Board and that meets such other requirements as the Board may establish by rule.

A graduate of a Board-approved medical school outside the United States or Canada shall submit evidence of success of completing at least three years of postgraduate training in a U.S. or Canadian program accredited by an organization that is acceptable to the Board and that meets such other requirements as the Board may establish by rule.

Examination. An applicant shall satisfy the Board’s requirements for medical licensing examination as established by the Board by rule. The Board may identify which examinations are accepted, set passing standards, and set limits on time and numbers of attempts for exams. The Board may establish by rule exceptions or alternative means to meet examination requirements.

ECFMG certificate. A graduate of a medical school outside the United States or Canada shall also submit evidence of certification by the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates unless the individual qualifies for licensure as a Fifth Pathway applicant, as established by the Board by rule.

Current medical practice. An applicant for licensure shall have actively engaged in the practice of medicine, as defined by section 1311 of this chapter, within three years prior to the date on which the application for licensure becomes complete. In its discretion, the Board may license an applicant who does not meet this practice requirement but who agrees to such conditions as the Board may reasonably require to verify or confirm the applicant’s readiness to reenter the practice of medicine.

License by faculty appointment.

The Board may issue a license without examination to a reputable physician who is a resident of a foreign country and who furnishes to the Board satisfactory proof of appointment to the faculty of a medical college in Vermont that is accredited by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education (LCME). The Board may establish additional conditions and requirements by rule for this type of license.

An applicant for a license pursuant to this subsection shall furnish to the Board satisfactory proof that the applicant is at least 18 years of age, has good moral character, is licensed to practice medicine in the applicant’s country of residence, and has been appointed to the faculty of an LCME-accredited medical college located in Vermont. The application shall include detailed information concerning the nature and term of the appointment, the method by which the applicant’s performance will be monitored and evaluated, and any other information the Board may require by rule.

A license issued pursuant to this subsection shall be for a period not to exceed the term of the faculty appointment and may, in the Board’s discretion, be for a shorter period.

A license issued pursuant to this subsection shall expire automatically upon termination for any reason of the licensee’s faculty appointment.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 256

;

1967, No. 307

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 22, 1968;

1969, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1971, No. 14

, § 15, eff. March 11, 1971;

1971, No. 184

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. March 29, 1972;

1977, No. 91

, § 2;

1977, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 39, 40;

2003, No. 34

, § 9, eff. May 23, 2003;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1392.
Limited temporary license for postgraduate training.

Qualifications for limited training license.

An applicant for a limited training license to practice medicine in a postgraduate training program shall meet each of requirements set forth in subdivisions (2)(A) through (E) of this subsection. A requirement may be met either by satisfying the requirement on its own terms or by qualifying for an exception established in this chapter or by the Board by rule.

An applicant shall submit evidence of identity acceptable to the Board and shall establish that the applicant:

is at least 18 years of age;

has graduated from a medical school accredited by an organization that is acceptable to the Board, or from a medical school that has been approved by the Board by rule;

has been accepted to participate in a postgraduate medical training program accredited by a body approved by the Board by rule;

is of sound moral character and professional competence as evidenced by the applicant’s entire personal history, as established by information about the applicant’s academic, licensing examination, employment, professional credentialing, professional certification, professional regulation, civil litigation, and criminal records submitted by the applicant or otherwise obtained by the Board in the application process; and

will be practicing in a program under the supervision of a Vermont-licensed physician who has acknowledged in writing:

the responsibility to ensure that the program operates in accordance with the requirements of the accrediting body; and

the responsibility to ensure that physicians in training practice only under the close supervision and control of Vermont-licensed physicians.

Terms of limited training license.

A limited training license shall be issued for the period of a “training year,” which shall run from July 1 through June 30. All limited training licenses shall expire at 12:00 midnight on July 1, regardless of when issued, unless the holder leaves the program before that date, in which case the license expires upon the holder leaving the program. The Board may issue a limited training license up to 90 days prior to the beginning of a training year.

A limited training license shall be renewed annually for each licensee who intends to continue to practice in a training program, in accordance with such requirements as the Board may provide by rule.

A limited training license authorizes the holder to practice only within the approved training program and only at sites that are part of the hospital or other facility hosting the training program, along with such other locations as may be formally designated as a training site of the program.

A limited training license shall become invalid 14 days after the supervising physician described in subdivision (a)(2)(E) of this subsection stops supervising the program for any reason, unless documentation of a new supervising physician is filed with the Board prior to the expiration of the 14-day period.

A physician practicing under a limited training license is subject to the provisions of section 1354 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§§ 1393-1394.
Repealed. 2019, No. 126 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1395.
License by endorsement.

The Board shall have an endorsement process for physician licensure that requires not more than three years of practice in good standing in another jurisdiction within the United States, regardless of whether that jurisdiction has licensing requirements substantially equal to those of this State, provided the applicant meets one of the following postgraduate training requirements:

A graduate of a U.S. or Canadian medical school accredited by a body that is acceptable to the Board shall have successfully completed at least two years of postgraduate training in a U.S. or Canadian program accredited by an organization that is acceptable to the Board.

A graduate of a Board-approved medical school outside the United States or Canada shall have successfully completed at least three years of postgraduate training in a U.S. or Canadian program accredited by an organization that is acceptable to the Board.

If the Board determines that three years of demonstrated practice in another specific jurisdiction is not adequately protective of the public, it shall provide its rationale to the Commissioner, who may propose any necessary statutory or rule amendments in order to implement more restrictive requirements for endorsement for that jurisdiction.

The Board may issue to an endorsement applicant a waiver of the practice requirement if there is a showing that the waiver follows State policy and the public is adequately protected.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 307

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 22, 1968;

1977, No. 91

, § 3, eff. May 5, 1977;

1977, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 41;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 19b, eff. June 13, 2002;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2017, No. 39

, § 2;

2019, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 1396.
Repealed. 2019, No. 126 (Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1397.
Repealed. 2011, No. 61, § 9(3), eff. June 2, 2011.

§ 1398.
Refusal or revocation of licenses.

The Board may refuse to issue a license or certificate to an applicant who applies to be licensed or certified under this chapter and who, by false or fraudulent representations, has obtained or sought to obtain practice in the profession, or by false or fraudulent representations in practice, has obtained or sought to obtain money or any other thing of value, or who assumes a name other than the applicant’s own for the purpose of misleading others, or for any other immoral, unprofessional, or dishonorable conduct.

A license or certificate shall not be suspended, except as provided in section 1365 or 1366 of this chapter; revoked; or refused until the holder or applicant:

is given a hearing before the Board using the same procedures as a hearing on disciplinary matters as set forth in sections 1372 through 1376 of this chapter;

is offered and declines or fails to attend a hearing; or

agrees to the action.

In the event of a revocation, the holder of any license or certificate so revoked shall promptly relinquish the license or certificate to the Secretary of the Board.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 307

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 22, 1968;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1399.
Repealed. 1975, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 1400.
Renewal of license; continuing medical education.

Every person licensed to practice medicine by the Board shall apply biennially for the renewal of his or her license. At least one month prior to the date on which renewal is required, the Board shall send to each licensee a license renewal application form and notice of the date on which the existing license will expire. On or before the renewal date, the licensee shall file an application for license renewal and pay the required fee. The Board shall register the applicant and issue the renewal license. Within one month following the date renewal is required, the Board shall pay the license renewal fees into the Board of Medical Practice Regulatory Fee Fund.

A licensee for renewal of an active license to practice medicine shall have completed continuing medical education that shall meet minimum criteria as established by rule, by the Board, by August 31, 2012 and that shall be in effect for the renewal of licenses to practice medicine expiring after August 31, 2014. The Board shall require a minimum of 10 hours of continuing medical education by rule. The training provided by the continuing medical education shall be designed to assure that the licensee has updated his or her knowledge and skills in his or her own specialties and also has kept abreast of advances in other fields for which patient referrals may be appropriate. The Board shall require evidence of current professional competence in recognizing the need for timely appropriate consultations and referrals to assure fully informed patient choice of treatment options, including treatments such as those offered by hospice, palliative care, and pain management services.

Subsection (c) effective 60 days after the adoption of the maintenance of licensure rule for physicians.

A licensee for renewal of an active license to practice medicine shall have practiced medicine within the last three years as defined in section 1311 of this title or have complied with the requirements for updating knowledge and skills as defined by Board rules.

All licensees shall demonstrate that the requirements for licensure are met.

A licensee shall promptly provide the Board with new or changed information pertinent to the information in his or her license and license renewal applications at the time he or she becomes aware of the new or changed information.

A person who practices medicine and who fails to renew his or her license in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be deemed an illegal practitioner and shall forfeit the right to so practice or to hold himself or herself out as a person licensed to practice medicine in the State until reinstated by the Board, except that a physician while on extended active duty as a member of the U.S. Armed Forces, a reserve component of the U.S. Armed Forces, the National Guard, or the State Guard who is licensed as a physician at the time of an activation or deployment shall receive an extension of licensure up to 90 days following the physician’s return from activation or deployment, provided the physician notifies the Board of his or her activation or deployment prior to the expiration of the current license and certifies that the circumstances of the activation or deployment impede good faith efforts to make timely application for renewal of the license.

Any person who allows a license to lapse by failing to renew the same in accordance with the provisions of this section may be reinstated by the Board by payment of the renewal fee, the late renewal penalty, and if applicable, by completion of the required continuing medical education requirement as established in subsection (b) of this section and any other requirements for licensure as required by this section and Board rule.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 307

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. March 22, 1968;

1975, No. 118

, § 80;

1975, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1977, No. 91

, § 4, eff. May 5, 1977;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 42;

1995, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 81;

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. June 13, 2002;

2011, No. 60

, § 7, eff. June 1, 2011;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1401.
Expired.

§ 1401a.
Fees.

The Department of Health shall collect the following fees:

Application for licensure, $650.00; the Board shall use at least $25.00 of this fee to support the cost of maintaining the Vermont Practitioner Recovery Network, which, for the protection of the public, monitors and evaluates, coordinates services for, and promotes rehabilitation of licensees who have or potentially have an impaired ability to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety.

Biennial renewal, $525.00; the Board shall use at least $25.00 of this fee to support the cost of maintaining the Vermont Practitioner Recovery Network, which, for the protection of the public, monitors and evaluates, coordinates services for, and promotes rehabilitation of licensees who have or potentially have an impaired ability to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety.

Initial limited temporary license; annual renewal $75.00.

Pursuant to qualifications and procedures determined by the Board, the Department shall, upon request, waive application fees to qualified military members and military spouses.

The Department of Health may charge the following fees:

Late renewal penalty of $25.00 for a renewal submitted less than 30 days late. Thereafter, the Department may increase the late renewal penalty by $5.00 for every additional month or fraction of a month, provided the total penalty for a late renewal shall not exceed $100.00.

Reinstatement of revoked or suspended license, $20.00.

Replacement of license, $20.00.

Verification of license, $40.00 and in fiscal year 2010 and thereafter $50.00.

Pre-application criminal background determination, $25.00.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a physician who holds an unrestricted license in all jurisdictions where the physician is currently licensed and who meets the criteria of the Board shall be licensed without fee if the physician certifies to the Board that he or she shall limit practice in Vermont solely to providing:
(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a physician who holds an unrestricted license in all jurisdictions where the physician is currently licensed and who meets the criteria of the Board shall be licensed without fee if the physician certifies to the Board that he or she shall limit practice in Vermont solely to providing:

pro bono services at a free or reduced-fee health care clinic in Vermont; or

volunteer services through the Vermont Medical Reserve Corps.

A physician, under this subsection, shall file with the Board using forms provided on the Board’s website, information on medical qualifications, professional discipline, criminal record, malpractice claims, or any other such information as the Board may require. A license granted under this subsection shall authorize the licensee to practice medicine either on a voluntary basis at a free or reduced fee clinic in Vermont or in connection with the Vermont Medical Reserve Corps, respectively.

If at any time an assessment is imposed on the State for its membership in the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact Commission pursuant to section 1420m of this title, the Board and the Board of Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons shall assume responsibility for paying the assessment from their respective special funds in proportional amounts based on their numbers of licensees for professions eligible for licensure through the Compact.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. Feb. 16, 1994; amended

1995, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

1999, No. 49

, § 209;

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 13, 2002;

2003, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2003, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 4a, eff. July 1, 2006;

2007, No. 76

, § 18;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2015, No. 57

, § 13;

2017, No. 39

, § 3;

2017, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 3a, eff. Jan. 1, 2020;

2019, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. April 1, 2021.

§ 1402.
Health maintenance organization; medical director.

A medical director who is a physician employed by a health maintenance organization in this State, which has individuals who have entered into contracts with a health maintenance organization for the provision of health care services, or on whose behalf such an arrangement has been made, shall possess a full and unrestricted license issued by the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 50; amended

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 1403.
Professional corporations; medicine.

A person licensed to practice medicine under this chapter may own shares in a professional corporation created under 11 V.S.A. chapter 4 that provides professional services in the medical and nursing professions.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 14

, § 1, eff. May 2, 2007; amended

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011.

§ 1404.
Applicant for expedited licensure; fingerprint data.

An applicant for expedited licensure pursuant to section 1420e of this chapter shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the Board for the purpose of obtaining State and federal criminal background checks pursuant to subdivision 1420e(b)(2) of this chapter. The Department of Public Safety may exchange fingerprint data with the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

Communications between the Board and the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact Commission regarding verification of physician eligibility for licensure under the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact shall not include any information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation related to State and federal criminal background checks performed for the purposes of subdivision 1420e(b)(2) of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2020.